Tennessee, session 114, SB1375.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-221-1306(c)(1), is amended by
deleting "sixty (60) days" and substituting "forty-five (45) days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1375
002904
- 1 -